Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.010

Definitions.

The words "governmental agency" as used in this chapter mean the United States of America, the state or any agency, subdivision, taxing district or municipal or quasi municipal corporation thereof.

The word "highways" as used in this chapter means all public roads, streets, expressways, parkways, scenic drives, bridges and other public ways, including without limitation, traffic control facilities, special lanes, turnouts or structures in, upon, over or under such public ways for exclusive or nonexclusive use by public transit vehicles, and landscaping, visual and sound buffers between such public ways and adjacent properties.

The words "open space, park, recreation and community facilities" as used in this chapter mean any public facility, improvement, development, property or right or interest therein for public park, recreational, green belt, arboretum, multi-purpose community center (as defined in RCW 35.59.010), museum, zoo, aquarium, auditorium, exhibition, athletic, historic, scenic, viewpoint, aesthetic, ornamental or natural resource preservation purposes.

The words "public health and safety facilities" as used in this chapter mean any public facility, improvement, development, property or right or interest therein, made, constructed or acquired for the purpose of protecting life from disease or injury, enforcing the criminal and civil laws or protecting property from damage caused by breach of law, including but not limited to public hospitals, health laboratories, public health clinics or service centers, custodial, correction or rehabilitation facilities, courtrooms, crime laboratories, law enforcement equipment and facilities, training facilities for specialized personnel, facilities for the collection, storage, retrieval or communication of information, and mobile, support or administrative facilities, all as necessary for the foregoing purpose, or any combination of the facilities herein described.

The words "stormwater control facilities" as used in this chapter mean any facility, improvement, development, property or interest therein, made, constructed or acquired for the purpose of controlling, or protecting life or property from, any storm, waste, flood or surplus waters wherever located within the county, and shall include but not be limited to the improvements and authority described in RCW 86.12.020 and chapters 86.13 and 86.15 RCW.

The word "county" as used in this chapter shall mean any county of the state of Washington.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 30 s 1; 1967 c 109 s 1.]